apertium-tur.tur.lexc
LEXICON CASE-NONOM

%<gen%>:%>%{N%}%{I%}n CLIT-GENERAL ;      
%<dat%>:%>%{y%}%{A%} CLIT-GENERAL ;   
%<acc%>:%>%{y%}%{I%} CLIT ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%} CLIT-GENERAL ;   
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}n CLIT-GENERAL ;  
%<ins%>:%>%{y%}l%{A%} CLIT-GENERAL ;     

LEXICON GENPOSS-ETC-NONOM
%<gen%>%<subst%>:%>%{n%}%{I%}nki%{n%} # ;
%<gen%>%<subst%>:%>%{n%}%{I%}nki%{n%} CASE-NONOM ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}ki ATTR-SUBST ;

CASE-NONOM ;

LEXICON CASE-ETC-NONOM

CASE-NONOM ;
GENPOSS-ETC-NONOM ;

LEXICON N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM

POSS-REAL ;
CASE-ETC-NONOM ;
!ABE-ETC ;
 
LEXICON CASE 

%<nom%>: CLIT-GENERAL ;               
%<gen%>:%>%{N%}%{I%}n CLIT-GENERAL ;     ! Kiev Ukrayna'nındı
%<dat%>:%>%{y%}%{A%} CLIT-GENERAL ;   
%<acc%>:%>%{y%}%{I%} CLIT ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%} CLIT-GENERAL ;   
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}n CLIT-GENERAL ;  
%<ins%>:%>%{y%}l%{A%} CLIT-GENERAL ;     

!!!! POSSESSIVES

LEXICON GENPOSS-ETC 

%<gen%>%<subst%>:%>%{N%}%{I%}nki%{n%} CASE ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}ki ATTR-SUBST ;
%<sim%>:%>%{C%}%{A%} CLIT-GENERAL ;  ! CLITICS-NO-COP

! CASE ;  ! FIXME: CHECK

LEXICON CASE-ETC

CASE ;
GENPOSS-ETC ;
  
LEXICON GER-CASE-ETC

CASE ;
GER-GENPOSS-ETC ;
 
LEXICON GER-GENPOSS-ETC 

!%<gen%>%<subst%>:%>%{N%}%{I%}ki%{n%} CASE ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}ki ATTR-SUBST ;

LEXICON POSS-REAL

%<px1sg%>:%>%{i%}m CASE-ETC ;                
%<px2sg%>:%>%{i%}n CASE-ETC ;                 
%<px3sp%>%<nom%>:%>%{s%}%{I%} CLIT-GENERAL ; 
%<px3sp%>:%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} CASE-ETC-NONOM ; 
%<px1pl%>:%>%{i%}m%{I%}z CASE-ETC ;           
%<px2pl%>:%>%{i%}n%{I%}z CASE-ETC ;      
%<px3pl%>%<nom%>:%>l%{A%}r%{I%} CLIT-GENERAL ;  
%<px3pl%>:%>l%{A%}r%{I%}%{n%} CASE-ETC-NONOM ;  

LEXICON GER-POSS-REAL

%<px1sg%>:%>%{i%}m GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px2sg%>:%>%{i%}n GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px3sp%>:%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px1pl%>:%>%{i%}m%{I%}z GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px2pl%>:%>%{i%}n%{I%}z GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px3pl%>:%>l%{A%}r%{I%}%{n%} GER-CASE-ETC ;


LEXICON N-INFL-COMMON

POSS-REAL ;
CASE-ETC ;
!ABE-ETC ;

LEXICON GER-N-INFL-COMMON

GER-POSS-REAL ;
GER-CASE-ETC ;
!GER-ABE-ETC ;

LEXICON SUBST-NONOM

N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ; 
%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r N-INFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON SUBST

N-INFL-COMMON ; 
%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r N-INFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON GER-SUBST

GER-N-INFL-COMMON ; 
%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r GER-N-INFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON ABESSIVE-POSTPOSITION

!%+sız%<post%>:%>s%{I%}z # ;
%+sız%<post%>:%>s%{I%}z PP-PERS ;

LEXICON LI-POSTPOSITION

!%+lı%<post%>:%>l%{I%} # ;
%+lı%<post%>:%>l%{I%} PP-PERS ;

LEXICON PP-PERS
# ;
%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{y%}%{I%}m  # ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>s%{I%}n  # ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r  # ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{y%}%{I%}z  # ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>s%{I%}n%{I%}z  # ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r  # ;

LEXICON FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION

SUBST ;
ABESSIVE-POSTPOSITION ;
LI-POSTPOSITION ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! Noun paradigms
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON N1 ! Generic noun paradigm.
           ! e.g. ev, kitap, ...

%<n%>%+laş:%>l%{A%}ş V-IR-IV ;
%<n%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;
%<n%>%<attr%>: # ;  

LEXICON N2 ! Compound nouns with compulsory possession. 
           ! e.g. dikiş makinası, dikiş makinaları, ...

%<n%>: POSS-REAL ; 
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r POSS-REAL ; 

LEXICON N3 ! Nationalities which can form language, etc.
           ! e.g. turk, turkçe

%<n%>: SUBST ; 
%<adj%>: ADJ-CLIT ;
%<adj%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;
%<n%>%+laş:%>l%{A%}ş V-IR-IV ;

LEXICON N4 ! Nouns with usage as postpositions. 
           ! We separate these in case they have some different morphotactics.
           ! e.g. arka: arkasına, iç: içinde

%<n%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ; 

LEXICON N5

%<n%>%<nom%>: CLIT-GENERAL ;
%<n%>:%' N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;
%<n%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:%>l%{A%}r CLIT-GENERAL ;
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r%' N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;
%<n%>%<attr%>: # ;

!!LEXICON N6 ! Languages which aren't nationalities
!!           ! e.g. 
!!
!!%<n%>: SUBST ; 
!!%<n%>%<attr%>: # ;
!!%<n%>%<advl%>: # ;
!!

!!!LEXICON N-COMPOUND-PX-COMMON
!!!
!!!:%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} CASE-ETC ;
!!!POSS-REAL ;   ! for stuff like "биздин аба ырайыбыз" and even "анын аба ырайы",
!!!              ! which should have a <px3sp> analysis


!!!LEXICON N-INFL-3PX-COMPOUND
!!!
!!!%<n%>: N-COMPOUND-PX-COMMON ;
!!!%<n%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} CASE-ETC ;
!!!


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NP-TOP

%<np%>%<top%>%<nom%>: # ;
! @@ NOTE: This will generate Türkiyeydi instead of Türkiye'ydi, but adding %' would cause
!          generation of nom+cop.aor.p3.sg as Türkiye'
%<np%>%<top%>%<nom%>: CLIT-GENERAL ; ! Dir/RL   
%<np%>%<top%>:%' N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;
%<np%>%<top%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<np%>%<top%>: LI-POSTPOSITION ;
%<np%>%<top%>:%' ABESSIVE-POSTPOSITION ;
%<np%>%<top%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:%>l%{A%}r # ;
%<np%>%<top%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r%' N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;

LEXICON NP2-TOP

%<np%>%<top%>%<px3sp%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<np%>%<top%>%<px3sp%>%<nom%>: CLIT-GENERAL ; ! Dir/RL
%<np%>%<top%>%<px3sp%>:%'%{n%} CASE-ETC-NONOM ;

LEXICON NP3-TOP

%<np%>%<top%>%<pl%>%<px3sp%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<np%>%<top%>%<pl%>%<px3sp%>%<nom%>: CLIT-GENERAL ; ! Dir/RL
%<np%>%<top%>%<pl%>%<px3sp%>:%'%{n%} CASE-ETC-NONOM ;

LEXICON NP4-TOP

%<np%>%<top%>%<pl%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<np%>%<top%>%<pl%>%<nom%>: CLIT-GENERAL ; ! Dir/RL
%<np%>%<top%>%<pl%>:%' N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;


LEXICON NP-ORG

%<np%>%<org%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<np%>%<org%>:%' N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;
%<np%>%<org%>%<attr%>: # ;

!!LEXICON NP2-ORG
!!
!!%<np%>%<org%>%<px3sp%>%<nom%>: # ;
!!%<np%>%<org%>%<px3sp%>:%'%{n%} N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;
!!
LEXICON NP-ORG-COMPOUND-PX

%<np%>%<org%>:%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} CASE-ETC ;
POSS-REAL ;   ! for stuff like "биздин аба ырайыбыз" and even "анын аба ырайы",
              ! which should have a <px3sp> analysis


LEXICON NP-ANT-M

%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<nom%>: CLIT-GENERAL ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<nom%>:%' V-NOPERS-COP ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>:%' N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;
!%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:%>l%{A%}r CLIT-GENERAL ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r%' N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;

LEXICON NP-ANT-F

%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>%<nom%>: CLIT-GENERAL ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>%<nom%>:%' V-NOPERS-COP ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>:%' N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;
!%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:%>l%{A%}r CLIT-GENERAL ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r%' N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;

LEXICON NP-COG-ZADE

%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>%<nom%>:zade # ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>%<nom%>:zade%' V-NOPERS-COP ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>:zade%' N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>%<attr%>:zade # ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:zade%>l%{A%}r # ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>%<pl%>:zade%>l%{A%}r%' N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>%<nom%>:%-zade # ; ! Dir/LR
%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>%<nom%>:%-zade%' V-NOPERS-COP ; ! Dir/LR
%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>:%-zade%' N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>%<attr%>:%-zade # ; ! Dir/LR
%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:%-zade%>l%{A%}r # ; ! Dir/LR


LEXICON NP-COG-MF

%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>%<nom%>:%' V-NOPERS-COP ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>:%' N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:%>l%{A%}r # ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r%' N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;

LEXICON NP-COG-OV

%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>%<nom%>:%' V-NOPERS-COP ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>:%' N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:%>l%{A%}r # ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r%' N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;
a%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>%<nom%>:a # ;
a%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>%<nom%>:a%' V-NOPERS-COP ;
a%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>:a%' N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;
a%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>%<attr%>:a # ;
a%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:a%>l%{A%}r # ;
a%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>%<pl%>:a%>l%{A%}r%' N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS
sen%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<gen%>%<subst%>:seninki SUBST ; 
o%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<gen%>%<subst%>:onunki SUBST ; 
biz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<gen%>%<subst%>:bizimki SUBST ; 
siz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<gen%>%<subst%>:sizinki SUBST ; 
siz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>%<gen%>%<subst%>:sizinki SUBST ; 
bizler%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<gen%>%<subst%>:bizlerinki SUBST ; 
sizler%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<gen%>%<subst%>:sizlerinki SUBST ; 
onlar%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<gen%>%<subst%>:onlarınki SUBST ; 
LEXICON Nouns
kadak:kadak N1 ; !
radyo% komisyonu:radyo% komisyon N2 ; ! Dir/RL ! Use/MT 
şubat:Şubat N5 ; ! "February"
mart:Mart N5 ; ! "March"
nisan:Nisan N5 ; ! "April"
mayıs:Mayıs N5 ; ! "May"
haziran:Haziran N5 ; ! "June"
temmuz:Temmuz N5 ; ! "July"
eylül:Eylül N5 ; ! "September"
kasım:Kasım N5 ; ! "November"
akın:akın N1 ; ! "invasion"
diken:diken N1 ; ! "prickle"
hazırlık:hazırlık%{v%} N1 ; ! "preparation"
kayak:kayak N1 ; ! "ski"
meşguliyet:meşguliyet N1 ; ! "occupation"
ada% çayı:ada% çay N2 ; ! "sage"
dikiş% makinası:dikiş% makina N2 ; ! "sewing machine"
mal% varlığı:mal% varlık N2 ; ! "property"
yurt% dışı:yurt% dış N2 ; ! "abroad"
yanlısı:yanlı N2 ; ! Dir/RL ! Use/MT
gerçek:gerçek%{v%} N1 ; ! ""
iç:iç N4 ; ! "inside"
yüz:yüz N4 ; ! "face"
geri:geri N4 ; ! "back"
ara:ara N4 ; ! "space"
taraf:taraf N4 ; ! ""
üst:üst N4 ; ! ""
karşı:karşı N4 ; ! "front"
ön:ön N4 ; !
Kırım% Tatarı:kırım% tatar N2 ;
türk:Türk N3 ; ! "Turk"
arnavut:Arnavut N3 ; ! ""
kürt:Kürt N3 ; ! ""
mısırlı:Mısırlı N3 ; ! "Egyptian" 
sloven:Sloven N3 ; ! ""
isveçli:isveçli N3 ; ! "Swede"
moğol:moğol N3 ; ! "Mongol" Dir/LR
roman:roman N3 ; ! "roman" Dir/LR
el% bombası:el% bomba N1 ;
orkestra% şefi:orkestra% şef N2 ; ! Dir/RL ! Use/MT
LEXICON ProperNouns
Tulkibas:Tulkibas NP-TOP ; ! Use/MT
Simun:Simun NP-ANT-M ; !
Kate:Kate NP-ANT-F ; !
Vakfıkebir:Vakfıkebir NP-ORG ; !
Mary:Mary NP-ANT-F ; !
Haman:Haman NP-ANT-M ; !
Zübeyre:Zübeyre NP-ANT-F ; !
Deslo:Deslo NP-ANT-M ; !
Abdurahman:Abdurahman NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Hacer:Hacer NP-ANT-F ; !
Beytsaida:Beytsaida NP-TOP ; !
Mar:Mar NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Vadim:Vadim NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Kasparov:Kasparov NP-COG-OV ; ! ""
Şaymiyev:Şaymiyev NP-COG-OV ; ! ""
Ganiyev:Ganiyev NP-COG-OV ; ! ""
Honduras:Honduras NP-TOP ; ! ""
Santoron:Santoron NP-TOP ; ! ""
Kansas:Kansas NP-TOP ; ! ""
Ege% Denizi:Ege% Denizi NP2-TOP ; ! ""
İyon% Denizi:İyon% Denizi NP2-TOP ; ! ""
Yunan% Denizi:Yunan% Denizi NP2-TOP ; ! ""
Mora% Yarımadası:Mora% Yarımadası NP2-TOP ; ! ""
Çin% Halk% Cumhuriyeti:Çin% Halk% Cumhuriyeti NP2-TOP ; ! ""
Sırp% Cumhuriyeti:Sırp% Cumhuriyeti NP2-TOP ; ! "Respublika Srpska"
Amerika% Birleşik% Devletleri:Amerika% Birleşik% Devletleri NP3-TOP ; ! ""
Tanrı% Dağı:Tanrı% Dağı NP3-TOP ; ! "
Sovyet% Sosyalist% Cumhuriyetler% Birliği:Sovyet% Sosyalist% Cumhuriyetler% Birliği NP3-TOP ; ! ""
Balkanlar:Balkanlar NP4-TOP ; ! ""
PCK:PCK NP-ORG ; !
UNDP:UNDP NP-ORG ; ! ""
SC:SC%{ь%} NP-ORG ; ! ""
BSP:BSP NP-ORG ; ! ""
Vefa% SK:Vefa% SK NP-ORG ; ! ""
Catania:Catania NP-ORG ; ! ""
Atletizm% Ligi:Atletizm% Lig NP-ORG-COMPOUND-PX ; ! ""
Danimarka% Süper% Ligi:Danimarka% Süper% Lig NP-ORG-COMPOUND-PX ; ! ""
İngiliz% Futbol% Ligi:İngiliz% Futbol% Lig NP-ORG-COMPOUND-PX ; ! ""
İzmir% Futbol% Ligi:İzmir% Futbol% Lig NP-ORG-COMPOUND-PX ; ! ""
Lombard% Ligi:Lombard% Lig NP-ORG-COMPOUND-PX ; ! ""
Sırasıyla% Türkiye% Basketbol% Ligi:Sırasıyla% Türkiye% Basketbol% Lig NP-ORG-COMPOUND-PX ; ! ""
Türkiye% Ulusal% Futbol% Ligi:Türkiye% Ulusal% Futbol% Lig NP-ORG-COMPOUND-PX ; ! ""
Fatih:Fatih NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Nataşa:Nataşa NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Salimzyanov:Salimzyanov NP-COG-OV ; ! ""
Tayyip:Tayyip NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Clare:Clare NP-ANT-F;
Aurescu:Aurescu NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Jelaviç:Jelaviç NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Aartsen:Aartsen NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Dragutinoviç:Dragutinoviç NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Siderov:Siderov NP-COG-OV ; ! ""
Çobanzade:Çoban NP-COG-ZADE; ! ""
Şemizade:Şemi NP-COG-ZADE ;
Abdennanov:Abdennanov NP-COG-OV ;
Vorontsov:Vorontsov NP-COG-OV ;
Ostapenko:Ostapenko NP-COG-MF ;
Fazılova:Fazılova NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
İzetov:İzetov NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Poninka:Poninka NP-TOP ; ! ""
Çernobil:Çernobil NP-TOP ; ! ""
Rusya% Federasyonu:Rusya% Federasyonu NP2-TOP ; ! "" ! Use/MT
